Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.190

Conditional release—Revocation or modification of terms—Procedure.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Any person submitting reports pursuant to RCW 10.77.160, the secretary, or the prosecuting attorney may petition the court to, or the court on its own motion may schedule an immediate hearing for the purpose of modifying the terms of conditional release if the petitioner or the court believes the released person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release or is in need of additional care and treatment.

(2) If the prosecuting attorney, the secretary of social and health services, the secretary of corrections, or the court, after examining the report filed with them pursuant to RCW 10.77.160, or based on other information received by them, reasonably believes that a conditionally released person is failing to adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her conditional release the court or secretary of social and health services or the secretary of corrections may order that the conditionally released person be apprehended and taken into custody. The court and the person's attorney of record shall be notified of the apprehension before the close of the next judicial day. The court shall schedule a hearing within 30 days to determine whether or not the person's conditional release should be modified or revoked. Both the prosecuting attorney and the conditionally released person shall have the right to request an immediate mental examination of the conditionally released person. If the conditionally released person is indigent, and so requests, the court shall assist the person in obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to examine the person on his or her own behalf. An expert or professional person obtained by a conditionally released indigent person who was committed into state psychiatric care following acquittal by reason of insanity shall be compensated out of funds of the office of public defense as provided in policies and procedures under chapter 2.70 RCW, in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct and the standards for indigent defense.

(3) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient care determines that a conditionally released person presents a threat to public safety, the hospital or facility shall immediately notify the secretary of social and health services or the secretary of corrections or their designees. The secretary shall order that the conditionally released person be apprehended and taken into custody.

(4) The court, upon receiving notification of the apprehension, shall promptly schedule a hearing. The issue to be determined is whether the conditionally released person did or did not adhere to the terms and conditions of his or her release, or whether the person presents a threat to public safety. Pursuant to the determination of the court upon such hearing, the conditionally released person shall either continue to be conditionally released on the same or modified conditions or his or her conditional release shall be revoked and he or she shall be committed subject to release only in accordance with provisions of this chapter.

[ 2023 c 120 s 11; 2010 c 263 s 7; 1998 c 297 s 43; 1993 c 31 s 10; 1982 c 112 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 15; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 19.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 120: See notes following RCW 2.70.027.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.